Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission.

Sec. 16.43.010.
Purpose and findings of fact.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote the conservation and the sustained yield management of Alaska’s fishery resource and the economic health and stability of commercial fishing in Alaska by regulating and controlling entry of participants into the commercial fisheries in the public interest and without unjust discrimination.

The legislature finds that commercial fishing for fishery resources has reached levels of participation, on both a statewide and an area basis, that have impaired or threaten to impair the economic welfare of the fisheries of the state, the overall efficiency of the harvest, and the sustained yield management of the fishery resource.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am §§ 4, 5 ch 137 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 2 SLA 2014)

Sec. 16.43.020.
Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission.

There is established the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission as a regulatory and quasi-judicial agency of the state. The commission consists of two members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature in joint session.

The governor shall designate one member of the commission as chair of the commission. The designated member serves as chair for a term of two years and may be designated chair for successive two-year terms. When there is a vacancy in the executive director position, the member serving as chair is responsible for and has authority over the internal administrative and personnel practices and procedures of the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 8 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “consists of two members” for “consists of three members” following “The commission”; in (b), made stylistic changes in the first sentence, added the second sentence.

Sec. 16.43.030.
Term of office; vacancy and removal.

The members of the commission shall be appointed for terms of four years.

A vacancy on the commission shall be filled by appointment by the governor and the appointment shall be confirmed by the legislature in joint session. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member selected to fill a vacancy shall hold office for the balance of the full term for which the member’s predecessor on the commission was appointed.

If there is a vacancy on the commission, a single commissioner may exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the commission.

The governor may remove a commissioner from office for cause, including but not limited to incompetence, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office. A commissioner being removed for cause shall be given a copy of the charges and afforded an opportunity to publicly present a defense in person or by counsel upon not less than 10 days’ notice. If a commissioner is removed for cause, the governor shall file with the lieutenant governor a complete statement of all charges made against the commissioner and the governor’s findings based on the charges, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 35 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 9 ch 80 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1983, the former last three sentences of (a) of this section were redrafted and reorganized into present subsection (d).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, rewrote (c), which read, “A vacancy on the commission does not impair the authority of a quorum of commissioners to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the commission.”

Sec. 16.43.040.
Quorum.

Unless there is a vacancy on the commission, two members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, for the performance of a duty, or for the exercise of a power of the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 10 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added “Unless there is a vacancy on the commission,” at the beginning, and made a related change.

Sec. 16.43.050.
Qualifications.

The commission shall consist of two members with a broad range of professional experience, neither of whom has a vested economic interest in an interim-use permit, entry permit, commercial fishing vessel or gear, or in any fishery resource processing or marketing business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, substituted “consist of two members” for “consist of three members” following “The commission shall”, and made a related change.

Sec. 16.43.060.
Compensation.

Members of the commission are in the exempt service and are entitled to a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 25 of the salary schedule in AS

39.27.011

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 263 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 17 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2008; am § 12 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 16. ch. 66, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, substituted “Range 25 of the salary schedule” for “Range 27 of the salary schedule” following “equal to a step in”.

Sec. 16.43.070.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general is the legal counsel for the commission. The attorney general shall advise the commission in legal matters arising in the discharge of its duties and represent the commission in suits to which it is a party.
However, the commission may retain additional legal counsel as appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973)

Sec. 16.43.080.
Employment of personnel.

The commission may employ those persons necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Employees of the commission are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

.

In addition to its staff of regular employees, the commission may contract for and engage the services of consultants, experts, and hearing officers as necessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973)

Sec. 16.43.100.
Duties and general powers.

To accomplish the purposes set out in AS

16.43.010

, the commission shall

regulate entry into the commercial fisheries for all fishery resources in the state;

establish priorities for the application of the provisions of this chapter to the various commercial fisheries of the state;

establish administrative areas suitable for regulating and controlling entry into the commercial fisheries;

establish, for all types of gear, the maximum number of entry permits for each administrative area;

designate, when necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, particular species for which separate interim-use permits or entry permits will be issued;

establish qualifications for the issuance of entry permits;

issue entry permits to qualified applicants;

issue interim-use permits as provided in AS

16.43.210

,

16.43.220

, and

16.43.225

;

establish, for all types of gear, the optimum number of entry permits for each administrative area;

administer the buy-back program provided for in AS

16.43.310

and

16.43.320

to reduce the number of outstanding entry permits to the optimum number of entry permits;

provide for the transfer and reissuance of entry permits to qualified transferees;

provide for the transfer and reissuance of entry permits for alternative types of legal gear, in a manner consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

establish and administer the collection of the annual fees provided for in AS

16.43.160

;

administer the issuance of commercial fishing vessel licenses under AS

16.05.490

;

issue educational entry permits to applicants who qualify under the provisions of AS

16.43.340

—

16.43.390

;

establish reasonable user fees for services;

issue landing permits under AS

16.05.675

and regulations adopted under that section;

establish and collect annual fees for the issuance of landing permits that reasonably reflect the costs incurred in the administration and enforcement of provisions of law related to landing permits;

establish a moratorium on entry into commercial fisheries as provided in AS

16.43.225

; and

when requested by a regional development organization formed under former AS

44.33.895

, provide to the organization, without charge, public information contained in the commission’s data with respect to relevant fisheries, including limited fisheries, fishery participants, and limited entry permit holders’ harvests and earnings.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

The commission may do all things necessary to the exercise of its powers under this chapter, whether or not specifically designated in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; § 14 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2001; am §§ 6, 27 ch 137 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2009; am §§ 3, 20 ch 2 SLA 2014)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2014, the word “former” was inserted before the reference to AS

44.33.895

in (a)(20), to reflect the 2013 repeal of AS

44.33.895

under sec. 2, ch. 43, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 1, ch. 110, SLA 2003, sec. 1, ch. 51, SLA 2005, and sec. 1, ch. 69, SLA 2008.

Cross references. —

For current provisions similar to those of former AS

44.33.895

, referred to in paragraph (a)(20), see AS 44.33.896.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

For limited fisheries, see 20 AAC 5, art. 3.

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For fisheries subject to moratoria on new entrants, see 20 AAC 5, art. 10.

For optimum numbers of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 11.

For vessel permit systems, see 20 AAC 5, art. 14.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

For administrative hearings and adjudications, see 20 AAC 5, art. 18.

Sec. 16.43.105.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991. For current law, see AS 37.05.142 — 37.05.144.]

Sec. 16.43.110.
Regulations and hearing procedures.

The commission may adopt regulations, consistent with law, necessary or proper in the exercise of its powers or for the performance of its duties under this chapter.

The commission shall adopt regulations, consistent with due process of law, that govern practice and procedure and the conduct of all investigations, hearings, and proceedings that it holds.

The Alaska Rules of Evidence apply to investigations, hearings, and proceedings before the commission, except when the commission determines that their application is not required in order to assure fair treatment of all parties and that the evidence is relevant and of the sort on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious matters.

The commission, a commissioner, or an employee authorized by the commission may administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas and other process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of testimony, records, papers, accounts, and documents in an inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding before the commission in any part of the state. The commission may petition a court to enforce its subpoenas or other process.

The commission shall adopt regulations to provide for the correction of administrative error.

In case of a tie vote between commissioners in an adjudicatory proceeding, the decision of the hearing officer is the final administrative decision of the commission subject to review by a superior court under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 6 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

For limited fisheries, see 20 AAC 5, art. 3.

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For fisheries subject to moratoria on new entrants, see 20 AAC 5, art. 10.

For optimum numbers of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 11.

For vessel permit systems, see 20 AAC 5, art. 14.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

For administrative hearings and adjudications, see 20 AAC 5, art. 18.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (f).

Sec. 16.43.120.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

The administrative adjudication procedures of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) do not apply to adjudicatory proceedings of the commission except that final administrative determinations by the commission are subject to judicial review as provided in AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

and

44.62.640

apply to regulations adopted by the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative hearings and adjudications, see 20 AAC 5, art. 18.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.320

” at the beginning.